Maryland, session 2025, SB0233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0233*

SENATE BILL 233
(b) “Board” means the Advisory Board on Prescription Drug Monitoring.
(c) (1) “Dispense” has the meaning stated in § 12–101 of the Health
Occupations Article.
(2) “Dispense” does not include:
(i) Directly administering a monitored prescription drug to a
patient; or
(ii) Giving out prescription drug samples.
(d) (1) “Dispenser” means a person authorized by law to dispense a monitored
prescription drug to a patient or the patient’s agent in the State.
(2) “Dispenser” includes [a]:
(I) A nonresident pharmacy; AND
(II) A VETERINARIAN LICENSED UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 3 OF
THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE WHEN DISPENSING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES FOR
ANIMALS IN THE USUAL COURSE OF PROVIDING PROFESSIONAL SERVICES.
(3) “Dispenser” does not include:
(i) A licensed hospital pharmacy that only dispenses a monitored
prescription drug for direct administration to an inpatient of the hospital;
(ii) An opioid treatment services program;
(iii) [A veterinarian licensed under Title 2, Subtitle 3 of the
Agriculture Article when prescribing controlled substances for animals in the usual course
of providing professional services;
(iv)] A pharmacy issued a waiver permit under COMAR 10.34.17.03
that provides pharmaceutical specialty services exclusively to persons living in assisted
living facilities, comprehensive care facilities, and developmental disabilities facilities; and
[(v)] (IV) A pharmacy that:
1. Dispenses medications to an inpatient hospice; and
2. Has been granted a waiver under § 21–2A–03(f) of this
subtitle.

SENATE BILL 233 3
(e) “Licensing entity” means an entity authorized under the AGRICULTURE
ARTICLE OR THE Health Occupations Article to license, regulate, or discipline a prescriber
or dispenser.
(f) (1) “Monitored prescription drug” means a prescription drug that contains
a Schedule II, Schedule III, Schedule IV, or Schedule V controlled dangerous substance
designated under Title 5, Subtitle 4 of the Criminal Law Article.
(2) “Monitored prescription drug” does not include naloxone medication.
(g) “Naloxone medication” means an opioid antagonist approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration for the reversal of an opioid overdose.
(h) “Naloxone medication data” means the information submitted to the Program
for naloxone medication.
(i) “Office” means the Office of Controlled Substances Administration in the
Department.
(j) “Opioid treatment services program” means a program that:
(1) Is certified in accordance with § 8–401 of this article or licensed by the
State under § 7.5–401 of this article;
(2) Is authorized to treat patients with opioid dependence with a
medication approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for opioid dependence;
(3) Complies with:
(i) The Code of Federal Regulations 42, Part 8;
(ii) COMAR 10.47.02.11; and
(iii) Requirements for the secure storage and accounting of opioid
medication imposed by the federal Drug Enforcement Administration and the Office; and
(4) Has been granted a certification for operation by the Department, the
federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, and the federal
Center for Substance Abuse Treatment.
(k) “Pharmacist” means an individual who is licensed under Title 12 of the Health
Occupations Article, or by another state, to dispense a monitored prescription drug.
(l) “Pharmacist delegate” means an individual who is:
(1) Authorized by a registered pharmacist to request or access prescription
monitoring data; and

SENATE BILL 233
(2) Employed by or under contract with the same professional practice as
the registered pharmacist.
(m) “Prescriber” means a licensed health care professional authorized by law to
prescribe a monitored prescription drug.
(n) “Prescriber delegate” means an individual who is:
(1) Authorized by a registered prescriber to request or access prescription
monitoring data; and
(2) Employed by or under contract with the same professional practice as
the prescriber.
(o) “Prescription drug” has the meaning stated in § 21–201 of this title.
(p) “Prescription monitoring data” means the information submitted to the
Program for a monitored prescription drug.
(q) “Program” means the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program established
under this subtitle.
(r) “Registered” means registered with the Program to request or access
prescription monitoring data for clinical use.
(s) “Terminal illness” means a medical condition that, within reasonable medical
judgment, involves a prognosis for a patient that likely will result in the patient’s death
within 6 months.
21–2A–06.
(a) Prescription monitoring data:
(1) Are confidential and privileged, and not subject to discovery, subpoena,
or other means of legal compulsion in civil litigation;
(2) Are not public records; and
(3) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section or
as otherwise provided by law, may not disclosed to any person.
(b) The Program shall disclose prescription monitoring data, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Secretary, to:
(1) A prescriber, or licensed health care practitioner authorized by the
prescriber, in connection with the medical care of a patient;

SENATE BILL 233 5
(2) [A] EXCEPT FOR A VETERINARIAN, A dispenser, or a licensed health
care practitioner authorized by the dispenser, in connection with the dispensing of a
monitored prescription drug;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.